Idaho, session 2026, H0804.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-1406, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-1406. POWERS AND DUTIES OF HIGHWAY COMMISSIONERS -- ONE HIGHWAY
DISTRICT IN COUNTY -- HIGHWAY POWERS OF CITIES IN COUNTY ABOLISHED -- LAWS IN
CONFLICT SUPERSEDED. (1) The highway commissioners of a county-wide highway
district shall exercise all of the powers and duties provided in chapter 13,
title 40, Idaho Code, and are empowered to make highway ad valorem tax levies
as provided by chapter 8, title 40, Idaho Code. Only one (1) county-wide
highway district shall be operative within a county where the electorate has
voted affirmatively for the formation of a county-wide highway district.
The district shall specifically be responsible for all county secondary
and city highways and is hereby recognized as a body politic of this state.
Notwithstanding any other provision of Idaho Code, the highway district
may operate and expand an established public van and carpooling program,
rideshare platform, or park-and-ride facility. No city included within a
county-wide highway district shall maintain or supervise any city highways
or levy any ad valorem taxes for the construction, repair or maintenance of
city highways. No highway district included within a county-wide highway
district shall maintain any secondary highways or levy any ad valorem taxes
for the construction, repair or maintenance of highways. Wherever any pro-
visions of the existing laws of the state of Idaho are in conflict with the
provisions of this chapter, the provisions of this chapter shall control and
supersede all such laws. However, within the limits of any city, the city
may expend city funds for the placement, care and removal of trees, shrubs,
grass, and other plants that are located within the rights-of-way of any
highway of the county-wide highway district.
(2) If a city that is included within a county-wide highway district
annexes territory within the boundaries of an adjoining county within the
state, the single county-wide highway district's service area shall expand
to include the annexed area of such city.
(3) The commissioners of a county-wide highway district may pass or-
dinances and rules and make all regulations, not repugnant to law, as nec-
essary, for carrying into effect or discharging all powers and duties con-
ferred to a county-wide highway district pursuant to this chapter and chap-
ter 13, title 40, Idaho Code. All ordinances created or passed by the com-
missioners of a county-wide highway district shall require the affirmative
vote of two-thirds (2/3) of the members of the full county-wide highway dis-


trict commission. The style of all ordinances shall be: "BE IT ORDAINED by
the board of highway district commissioners of (........) County, Idaho."
All ordinances passed shall, before they take effect and within one (1) month
after they are passed, be published in at least one (1) issue of a newspaper
published in the county or, if no paper be published in the county, then in
some paper having general circulation therein. After such publication and
before its effective date, such proposed ordinance shall not thereafter be
amended wherein the amendment shall impose terms, conditions or privileges
less favorable to the county-wide highway district than the proposed ordi-
nance as published; but amendment favorable to the county-wide highway dis-
trict may be made at any time and after publication. All ordinances passed
pursuant to this section by the board of county-wide highway district com-
missioners may be proved by a certificate of the secretary of the county-wide
highway district under the seal of the board of the county-wide highway dis-
trict commissioners and shall be read and received in evidence in all courts
and administrative proceedings without further proof. If ordinances duly
passed are printed or published in book or pamphlet form by authority of the
county-wide highway district commissioners, the printed or published book
or pamphlet shall also be read and received in evidence in all courts and ad-
ministrative proceedings without further proof. The commissioners of the
county-wide highway district may enforce such ordinances by all appropriate
administrative or judicial proceedings.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.